Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.150

"Marked, stamped or branded" defined.

An article shall be deemed to be "marked, stamped or branded" whenever such article, or any box, package, cover or wrapper in which the same is enclosed, encased or prepared for sale or delivery, or any card, label or placard with which the same may be exhibited or displayed, is so marked, stamped or branded.

[ 1909 c 249 s 433; RRS s 2685.]